zh-CN: 足尖鞋鞋跟硬度: 柔韧; 硬; 中等; 软; 强; 其他
pt-BR: Sapatilha de ponta rigidez da alma: Flexível; Dura; Média; Macia; Forte; Outro
th: ความแข็งแรงของแกนรองเท้าบัลเล่ต์: ยืดหยุ่น; แข็ง; ปานกลาง; นุ่ม; แข็งแรง; อื่นๆ
el: Σκληρότητα κορμού παπουτσιού pointe: Εύκαμπτο; Σκληρό; Μεσαίο; Μαλακό; Δυνατό; Άλλο
sv: Pointe-skoskaftstyrka: Flexibel; Hård; Medium; Mjuk; Stark; Övrigt
lt-LT: Puantų standiklio standumas: Lankstus; Kietas; Vidutinis; Minkštas; Stiprus; Kita
tr: Bale ayakkabısı tabanının dayanıklılığı: Esnek; Sert; Orta; Yumuşak; Güçlü; Diğer
fi: Balettitossun (pointe) pohjallisen/rangan jäykkyys: Joustava; Kova; Keskikova; Pehmeä; Vahva; Muu
ko: 토슈즈 생크 강도: 유연함; 하드; 미디엄; 소프트; 스트롱; 기타
es: Resistencia del cambrillón de la zapatilla de punta: Flexible; Duro; Medio; Blando; Fuerte; Otro
vi: Độ bền của phần đế giày múa ba lê: Linh hoạt; Cứng; Trung bình; Mềm; Chắc chắn; Khác
hr-HR: Čvrstoća drške špica: Fleksibilno; Tvrdo; Srednje; Meko; Jako; Ostalo
ro-RO: Rezistența șancrului pantofului de vârf (pointe shoe): Flexibilă; Tare; Medie; Moale; Puternică; Altele
pt-PT: resistência da haste da sapatilha de pontas: Flexível; Dura; Média; Suave; Forte; Outra
ja: トウシューズのシャンク強度: フレキシブル; ハード; ミディアム; ソフト; ストロング; その他
nb: Styrke på tåspisskoens skaft: Fleksibel; Hard; Middels; Myk; Sterk; Annet
hu: Spicc-cipő talpbetétének merevsége: Rugalmas; Kemény; Közepes; Puha; Erős; Egyéb
pl: Twardość podeszwy usztywniającej pointy: Elastyczna; Twarda; Średnia; Miękka; Mocna; Inna
sl-SI: Trdnost podplatnega vložka baletnega copata: Prilagodljivo; Trdo; Srednje; Mehko; Močno; Drugo
sk-SK: Pevnosť klenku baletnej špičky: Flexibilná; Tvrdá; Stredná; Mäkká; Silná; Iné
da: Balletskos svangstyrke: Fleksibel; Hård; Medium; Blød; Stærk; Andet
zh-TW: 足尖鞋鞋芯硬度: 彈性; 硬; 中; 軟; 強; 其他
ru: Жесткость стельки пуантов: Гибкая; Жесткая; Средняя; Мягкая; Очень жесткая; Другое
fr: Rigidité du cambrion du chausson de pointe: Flexible; Dur; Moyen; Souple; Fort; Autre
de: Stärke des Spitzenschuhschafts: Flexibel; Hart; Mittel; Weich; Stark; Sonstige
bg-BG: Твърдост на подметката на палци: Гъвкава; Твърда; Средна; Мека; Силна; Други
nl: Spitzen schoen zoolversteviging sterkte: Flexibel; Hard; Medium; Zacht; Sterk; Overig
it: Rigidità del gambo della scarpa da punta: Flessibile; Duro; Medio; Morbido; Forte; Altro
en: Pointe shoe shank strength: Flexible; Hard; Medium; Soft; Strong; Other
cs: Pevnost dříku špičky: Flexibilní; Tvrdá; Střední; Měkká; Pevná; Jiné